Utah statutes.
41-6a-1010.   Unmarked crosswalk locations -- Restrictions on pedestrian.

(1)  A highway authority in its respective jurisdiction may, after an engineering and traffic investigation, designate unmarked crosswalk locations where:

(a)  pedestrian crossing is prohibited; or

(b)  pedestrians shall yield the right-of-way to vehicles.

(2)  The restrictions in Subsection (1) are effective only when traffic-control devices indicating the restrictions are in place.

